pt-PT: Tipo de controlador do veículo de controlo remoto: Comando gamepad; Controlo por gestos/movimentos; Transmissor com punho de pistola; App de smartphone; Comando tipo volante; Transmissor com manípulos; Outro
bg-BG: Тип контролер за RC превозно средство: Геймпад контролер; Управление с жестове/движение; Предавател пистолетен тип; Приложение за смартфон; Контролер с волан; Лостов предавател; Други
it: Tipo di controller del veicolo RC: Controller gamepad; Controllo gestuale/del movimento; Trasmettitore a pistola; App per smartphone; Controller a volante; Trasmettitore a stick; Altro
en: RC vehicle controller type: Gamepad controller; Gesture/motion control; Pistol-grip transmitter; Smartphone app; Steering wheel controller; Stick transmitter; Other
cs: Typ ovladače RC vozidla: Gamepadový ovladač; Ovládání gesty/pohybem; Vysílač s pistolovou rukojetí; Aplikace pro chytré telefony; Volantový ovladač; Páčkový vysílač; Ostatní
hr-HR: RC vozilo voditelj obrade tipa: Gamepad kontroler; Upravljanje gestama/pokretom; Odašiljač s pištoljskim rukohvatom; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Upravljač (volan); Odašiljač s palicama; Ostalo
tr: RC araç kumanda tipi: Oyun kumandası; Hareket/jest kontrolü; Tabanca kabzalı verici; Akıllı telefon uygulaması; Direksiyon kumandası; Çubuklu verici; Diğer
pl: Typ administratora pojazdu RC: Kontroler typu gamepad; Sterowanie gestami/ruchem; Aparatura pistoletowa; Aplikacja na smartfona; Kontroler z kierownicą; Aparatura drążkowa; Inne
sv: Typ av styrenhet för RC-fordon: Handkontroll; Gest-/rörelsestyrning; Sändare med pistolgrepp; Smartphone-app; Rattkontroll; Spaksändare; Övrigt
fr: Type de dispositif de commande du véhicule radiocommandé: Manette de jeu; Contrôle gestuel/par mouvement; Émetteur à poignée pistolet; Appli pour smartphone; Volant de commande; Émetteur à manches; Autre
el: Τύπος χειριστηρίου τηλεκατευθυνόμενου οχήματος: Χειριστήριο τύπου gamepad; Έλεγχος μέσω χειρονομιών/κίνησης; Πομπός με λαβή τύπου πιστολιού; Εφαρμογή για smartphone; Χειριστήριο με τιμόνι; Πομπός με μοχλούς (sticks); Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul de dată al operatorului de vehicul RC: Controller tip gamepad; Control prin gesturi/mișcare; Transmițător cu mâner tip pistol; App pe smartphone; Controller cu volan; Transmițător cu manete; Altele
es: Tipo de controlador de vehículo a control remoto: Mando de juegos; Control por gestos/movimiento; Transmisor de empuñadura de pistola; App para smartphone; Mando de volante; Transmisor de palanca; Otro
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan ajoneuvon ohjaintyyppi: Peliohjain; Ele-/liikeohjaus; Pistoolikahvainen lähetin; Älypuhelinsovellus; Rattiohjain; Sauvaohjain; Muu
da: RC-køretøjs styreenhedstype: Gamepad-controller; Gestus-/bevægelsesstyring; Pistolgreb-sender; Smartphone-app; Rat-controller; Stick-sender; Andet
ko: RC 차량 컨트롤러 유형: 게임패드 컨트롤러; 제스처/모션 제어; 권총 그립형 송신기; 스마트폰 앱; 스티어링 휠 컨트롤러; 스틱형 송신기; 기타
de: Fernsteuerungstyp des RC-Fahrzeugs: Gamepad-Controller; Gesten-/Bewegungssteuerung; Pistolengriff-Sender; Smartphone-App; Lenkrad-Controller; Knüppelsender; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta kontrolerja za daljinsko vodena vozila: Igralni plošček; Krmiljenje s kretnjami/gibanjem; Oddajnik v obliki pištole; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Krmilnik z volanom; Oddajnik z ročicami; Drugo
zh-TW: 遙控車控制器類型: 遊戲手把控制器; 手勢/體感控制; 槍控式發射器; 智慧型手機應用程式; 方向盤控制器; 搖桿發射器; 其他
sk-SK: Typ ovládača diaľkovo ovládaného vozidla: Gamepad; Ovládanie gestami/pohybom; Pištoľový vysielač; Aplikácia v smartfóne; Volantový ovládač; Páčkový vysielač; Iné
ru: Тип контроллера радиоуправляемого транспортного средства: Геймпад; Управление жестами/движением; Передатчик пистолетного типа; Приложение для смартфона; Контроллер в виде руля; Передатчик с джойстиками; Другое
zh-CN: 遥控车控制器类型: 游戏手柄控制器; 手势/体感控制; 枪式握把发射器; 智能手机应用; 方向盘控制器; 操纵杆发射器; 其他
pt-BR: RC veículo controlador tipo: Controle tipo gamepad; Controle por gestos/movimento; Transmissor tipo pistola; App de smartphone; Controle tipo volante; Transmissor tipo stick; Outros
lt-LT: RC transporto priemonės valdiklio tipas: Žaidimų pulto valdiklis; Valdymas gestais / judesiais; Siųstuvas su pistoletine rankena; Išmaniojo telefono programėlė; Vairo formos valdiklis; Svirtinis siųstuvas; Kita
hu: RC jármű vezérlőtípusa: Gamepad vezérlő; Gesztus-/mozgásvezérlés; Pisztoly markolatos távirányító; Okostelefonos alkalmazás; Kormánykerekes vezérlő; Karos távirányító; Egyéb
ja: RCカーコントローラータイプ: ゲームパッドコントローラー; ジェスチャー/モーションコントロール; ピストルグリップ送信機; スマートフォンアプリ; ステアリングホイールコントローラー; スティック送信機; その他
nb: Radiostyrt kjøretøys kontrollertype: Spillkontroller; Gest-/bevegelseskontroll; Sender med pistolgrep; Smarttelefonapp; Rattkontroller; Stikkesender; Annet
th: ประเภทตัวควบคุมรถบังคับวิทยุ: จอยเกมแพด; ควบคุมด้วยท่าทาง/การเคลื่อนไหว; รีโมตทรงปืน; แอปสมาร์ทโฟน; พวงมาลัยควบคุม; รีโมตแบบคันโยก; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại bộ điều khiển xe RC: Tay cầm chơi game; Điều khiển bằng cử chỉ/chuyển động; Bộ phát dạng báng súng; Ứng dụng trên điện thoại thông minh; Bộ điều khiển vô lăng; Bộ phát dạng cần gạt; Khác
nl: RC-voertuig controller type: Gamepad-controller; Gebaar-/bewegingsbesturing; Pistoolgreepzender; Smartphone-app; Stuurwielcontroller; Stick-zender; Overig